Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2846.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 204B.16, subdivision 1a, is amended to read: Subd. 1a. Notice to voters. new text begin (a) new text end If the location of a polling place has been changed, the governing body establishing the polling place shall send to every affected household with at least one registered voter in the precinct a nonforwardable mailed notice stating the location of the new polling place at least 25 days before the next election. The secretary of state shall prepare a sample of this notice. A notice that is returned as undeliverable must be forwarded immediately to the county auditor. This deleted text begin subdivisiondeleted text end new text begin paragraphnew text end does not apply to a polling place location that is changed on election day under section 204B.175. new text begin (b) If the location of a polling place has been changed, the local official for the governing body establishing the polling place must post a notice in large print and in a conspicuous place at the closed polling place, if practical, stating the location of the new polling place. The local election official must also post the notice, if practical, in a location visible by voters who vote from their motor vehicles as provided in section 204C.15, subdivision 2. The notice must be in all languages required under section 204B.295 for that precinct. The notice must be posted for each primary and general election until a general presidential election or redistricting has occurred. The secretary of state shall prepare a sample of this notice. new text end